Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-510
Land or real estate, defined.

Wherever the terms land or real estate are used in sections 46-501 to 46-573, they shall, unless otherwise specified, be held to mean real estate, as the words real estate are defined by the laws of the State of Nebraska, and shall embrace all railroads, highways, electrical roads, street and interurban railroads, roads, streets, street improvements, telephone, telegraph, and transmission lines, gas, sewer and water systems, water rights, pipelines and rights-of-way of public service corporations and all other real property whether held for public or private use.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 2(8), p. 525.